Georgia, session 2025_26, HB701.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a)(1) The clerk of the Probate Court of Terrell County is hereby authorized to charge
and collect a technology fee to be set by the judge of the probate court in an amount not
to exceed $5.00 for the filing of each civil action with the probate court and not to
exceed $5.00 as a surcharge upon each criminal fine assessed by the probate court.
(2) The clerk of the Probate Court of Terrell County is hereby authorized to charge and
collect a technology fee to be set by the judge of the probate court in an amount not to
exceed $5.00 for the filing of each civil action with the magistrate court and not to
exceed $5.00 as a surcharge upon each criminal fine assessed by the magistrate court.
H. B. 701
- 1 -

LC 47 3431/AP
(3) The technology fees collected pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection
shall be used exclusively to provide for technological needs of the Probate Court of
Terrell County. Such uses shall include only the following:
(A) Computer hardware, software, and accessory purchases;
(B) Lease, maintenance, and installation of computer hardware and software;
(C) Purchase, lease, maintenance, and installation of audio-visual, imaging, scanning,
facsimile, communications, projection, and printing equipment and software; and
(D) Procurement of services or equipment for the conversion of court records and
archives to digital content for public access.
(b) Funds collected pursuant to this section shall be maintained in a segregated account by
the clerk of the probate court, subject to audit by an auditor approved by the governing
authority of Terrell County, and shall be used only for the purposes authorized in this section.
(c) The authority to assess the technology fee pursuant to this Act shall terminate on
July 1, 2035, and any residual funds remaining in the account established by subsection (b)
of this section shall remain dedicated to general Terrell County technology uses.
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 701
- 2 -